src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no


!! # Inari Saami numerals



LEXICON Numeral !!≈ * **@CODE@**
HUNDREDSM ;		! 200M
čyeti HUNDREDM ;	! 100M
TENSM ;			! 20-99M
TEENSM ;		! 10-19M
ONESM ;			! 1-9M
HUNDREDST ;		! 200000-999999
HUNDREDST ;		! 200000-999999
čyeti  HUNDREDT ;	! 100000-100999
TENST ;			! 20000-99999,10000-10999
TEENST ;		! 11000-19999
ONEST ;			! 2000-9999
tuhháát  THOUSAND ;	! 1000-1999
UNDERTHOUSAND ;		! 100-999
TENS ;			! 20-99
TEENS ;			! 10-19
ONES ;			! 1-9
num-imprecise ;         ! kalle, ...
MISCNUM ;			! pelnub
ARABICS          ; ! for the arabic numerals !
ROMAN           ; ! for the roman numerals  !
NUM-PREFIXES    ; ! for §34 etc.            !
ISOLATED-NUMEXP ; ! for ½ etc.                      !
LOHKAI ;


LEXICON HUNDREDSM   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
kyehti   CUODIM ;
kulmâ  CUODIM ;
nelji  CUODIM ;
vittâ  CUODIM ;
kuttâ  CUODIM ;
čiččâm  CUODIM ;
käävci  CUODIM ;
oovce  CUODIM ;

LEXICON CUODIM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
čyeti HUNDREDM ;

LEXICON HUNDREDM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
TENSM ;
TEENSM ;
  ONESM ;
 MILJON ;

LEXICON TEENSM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
  TEENM ;

LEXICON TEENM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
ohtâ:oht^RVâ  LOHKAIM ;
kyehti  LOHKAIM ;
kulmâ  LOHKAIM ;
nelji  LOHKAIM ;
vittâ+Use/NG:vittâ  LOHKAIM ;
kuttâ+Use/NG:kuttâ  LOHKAIM ;
vitt  LOHKAIM ;
kutt  LOHKAIM ;
čiččâm  LOHKAIM ;
käävci  LOHKAIM ;
oovce  LOHKAIM ;

LEXICON LOHKAIM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
nubáloh MILJON ;

LEXICON TENSM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
love  MILJON ;
kyehti  LOGIM ;
kulmâ  LOGIM ;
nelji  LOGIM ;
vittâ  LOGIM ;
kuttâ  LOGIM ;
čiččâm  LOGIM ;
käävci  LOGIM ;
oovce  LOGIM ;

LEXICON LOGIM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
love  MILJON ;
love ONESM ;

LEXICON ONESM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
miljon%   OVERTHOUSANDS ;
kyehti  MILJON ;
kulmâ  MILJON ;
nelji  MILJON ;
vittâ  MILJON ;
kuttâ  MILJON ;
čiččâm  MILJON ;
käävci  MILJON ;
oovce  MILJON ; 

LEXICON MILJON  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
% miljona%  OVERTHOUSANDS ;

! =================
!! # Under the million
! =================

!! In principle as the above.

LEXICON OVERTHOUSANDS !!≈ * **@CODE@**
HUNDREDST ;		! x00.000.000
čyeđe  HUNDREDT ;	! 100.000.000
  TENST ;		!  20.000.000
  TEENST ;		!  10.000.000
  TWOST ;		!   2.000.000
  SEVENST ;		!   7.000.000
tuhháát THOUSAND ;	!   1.000.000
 UNDERTHOUSAND ;	
  TENS ;
  TEENS ;
  ONES ;
  num ;	!  x000000


LEXICON HUNDREDST !!≈ * **@CODE@**
kyehti   TWOCUODIT ;	! 200000-299999
kulmâ  TWOCUODIT ;	! 300000-399999
nelji  TWOCUODIT ;	! 400000-499999
vittâ  TWOCUODIT ;	! 500000-599999
kuttâ  TWOCUODIT ;	! 600000-699999
čiččâm  SEVENCUODIT ;	! 700000-799999
käävci  SEVENCUODIT ;	! 800000-899999
oovce  SEVENCUODIT ;	! 900000-999999

LEXICON TWOCUODIT !!≈ * **@CODE@**
čyeđe  HUNDREDT ;	! 100000-199999

LEXICON SEVENCUODIT !!≈ * **@CODE@**
čyeđe HUNDREDT ;

LEXICON HUNDREDT	 !!≈ * **@CODE@**  X = 1-9, Y = 0-9
TENST ;			! X2XYYY, X10YYY
TEENST ;		! X1XYYY
ohtâ:oht^RVâ TWOTHOUSANDS ; ! Same tuhháát as 2000
  ONEST ;		! XX0YYY
 THOUSANDS ;	! X00YYY

LEXICON TEENST !!≈ * **@CODE@**
  TEENT ;

LEXICON TEENT !!≈ * **@CODE@**
love  THOUSANDS ;
ohtâ:oht^RVâ  LOHKAIT ;
kyehti  LOHKAIT ;
kulmâ  LOHKAIT ;
nelji  LOHKAIT ;
vitt  LOHKAIT ;
vittâ+Use/NG:vittâ  LOHKAIT ;
kutt  LOHKAIT ;
kuttâ+Use/NG:kuttâ  LOHKAIT ;
čiččâm  LOHKAIT ;
käävci  LOHKAIT ;
oovce  LOHKAIT ;

LEXICON LOHKAIT !!≈ * **@CODE@**
nubáloh THOUSANDS ;

LEXICON TENST !!≈ * **@CODE@**
muádlov:muád#lov  LOGIT ;
maŋgâlov:maŋgâ#lov LOGIT ;
muáddilov+Use/NG:muáddi#lov  LOGIT ;
kyehtlov:kyeht#lov  LOGIT ;
kulmâlov:kulmâ#lov  LOGIT ;
kulmlov+Use/NG:kulm#lov  LOGIT ;
neljilov:nelji#lov  LOGIT ;
vittlov:vitt#lov  LOGIT ;
vittlov+Use/NG:vittâ#lov  LOGIT ;
kuttlov:kutt#lov  LOGIT ;
čiččâmlov:čiččâm#lov  LOGIT ;
kähcilov:kähci#lov  LOGIT ;
ohcelov:ohce#lov  LOGIT ;

LEXICON LOGIT !!≈ * **@CODE@**
  THOUSANDS ;
ohtâ:oht^RVâ  THOUSANDS ;
ONEST ;

LEXICON ONEST !!≈ * **@CODE@**
TWOST ;			! 2000-6999
SEVENST ;               ! 7000-9999

LEXICON THOUSANDS !!≈ * **@CODE@**
tuhháát  THOUSAND ;    ! 1000-1999

LEXICON TWOST !!≈ * **@CODE@**
kyeht  TWOTHOUSANDS ;
kulmâ  TWOTHOUSANDS ;
nelji  TWOTHOUSANDS ;
vittâ  TWOTHOUSANDS ;
kuttâ  TWOTHOUSANDS ;

LEXICON SEVENST !!≈ * **@CODE@**
čiččâm  SEVENTHOUSANDS ;
käävci  SEVENTHOUSANDS ;
oovce  SEVENTHOUSANDS ;

LEXICON TWOTHOUSANDS       !!≈ * **@CODE@** 2000 - 6999
tuhháát THOUSAND ;

LEXICON SEVENTHOUSANDS  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 7000 - 9999
tuhháát THOUSAND ;


LEXICON THOUSAND !!≈ * **@CODE@**
UNDERTHOUSAND ;	   ! 1100-1999
  TENS ;	   ! 1020-1099
  TEENS ;	   ! 1010-1019
  ONES ;	   ! 1001-1009
+Num:  X_POTTAAK ;	   ! 1000

!===========================
!! # Here starts the 999 numbers
!===========================

LEXICON UNDERTHOUSAND !!≈ * **@CODE@**
SEVENHUNDREDS ;
TWOHUNDREDS ;
čyeti:čyet^RCi3  HUNDRED ;
čyeti+Use/NG+Num+Sg+Gen:čyet  K ;


LEXICON SEVENHUNDREDS  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 700-900 with +Par
čiččâm  SEVENCUODI ;
käävci  SEVENCUODI ;
ohce  SEVENCUODI ;

LEXICON TWOHUNDREDS  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 200-699 with +Acc
kyehti  CUODI ;
kyeht+Use/NG:kyeht  CUODI ;
kulmâ  CUODI ;
kulm+Use/NG:kulm  CUODI ;
nelji  CUODI ;
vittâ  CUODI ;
vitt+Use/NG:vitt  CUODI ;
vit+Use/NG:vit  CUODI ;
kuttâ  CUODI ;
kutt+Use/NG:kutt  CUODI ;
kut+Use/NG:kut  CUODI ;

LEXICON SEVENCUODI  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 700-900 with +Par
čyeđe HUNDRED ;
čyet HUNDRED ;

LEXICON CUODI  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 200-699 with +Acc
čyeđe HUNDRED ;
čyet HUNDRED ;

LEXICON HUNDRED  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
TENS ;
TEENS ;
  ONES ;
 CYETI ;

LEXICON TEENS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
  TEEN ;

LEXICON TEEN  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
oht LOHKAI ;
ohtâ LOHKAI ;
kyeht LOHKAI ;
kyehti LOHKAI ;
kulmâ LOHKAI ;
kulm:kulm LOHKAI ;
nelji LOHKAI ;
vitt LOHKAI ;
vitt+Use/NG:vittâ LOHKAI ;
vit:vit LOHKAI ;
kutt LOHKAI ;
kuttâ LOHKAI ;
kut:kut LOHKAI ;
čiččâm LOHKAI ;
käävci LOHKAI ;
oovce LOHKAI ;


LEXICON LOHKAI  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
nubáloh:nubá# NUBALOH ;
nubáloh+Err/Orth:nuba# NUBALOH ;
 LOGAAT ;

LEXICON LOGAAT  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
nubálovváád+A+Ord:nubá#lovváád  X_EEMEED ; 

LEXICON TENS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
lovváád+A+Ord:lovváád X_EEMEED ; 
kyeht:kyeht^RC LOGIi ;
!kyehti LOGI ;
!kulm+Use/NG:kulm LOGI ;
kulmâ:ku^RVlmâ LOGI ;
nelji:ne^RVlji LOGI ;
vitt:vi LOGItt ;
kutt:ku LOGItt ;
čiččâm:čičč5âm LOGIm ;
kähci:kä^RVhc^RCi LOGIhc ;
ohce:o^RVhc^RCe LOGIhc ;
ohce:ohc^RCe oohceLOGIhc ;
muádi:muádi LOGI ;
muádi:muádd LOGI ;
muádlov:muád#  iLOV ;

LEXICON LOGIi  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
love: iLOVE ;
lov: iLOV ;
lov ONES ;

LEXICON LOGIhc  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
love: hcLOVE ;
lov: hcLOV ;
lov ONES ;

LEXICON oohceLOGIhc  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
lov+Num+Sg+Ill:^WG^RLEN%>lohá%>n K ; ! ovcelohán
lov+Num+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>lovve%>est K ; ! ovcelovveest



LEXICON LOGItt !!≈ * **@CODE@**
love: ttLOVE ;
lov: ttLOV ;
lov ONES ;


LEXICON LOGI  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
love: plussLOVE ;
lov: LOV ;
lov ONES ;

LEXICON LOGIm  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
love: mLOVE ;
lov: mLOV ;
lov ONES ;


LEXICON ONES  !!≈ * **@CODE@** to card and ord
CARDINAL ;
ORDINAL ;

LEXICON CARDINAL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** this is 1-10
ohtâ:o^RVht^RCâ OHTA ;
kyehti:kyeht^RCi KYEHTI ;
kulmâ:ku^RVlmâ KULMA ;
nelji:ne^RVlji KYEHTI ;
vittâ:vi^RVtt4â VITTA ;
kuttâ:ku^RVtt4â VITTA ;
čiččâm:čiččâm CICCAM ;
käävci:käävc^RCi KYEHTI ;
oovce:oovc^RCe KYEHTI ;
love: LOVE ;




LEXICON MISCNUM 			 !!≈ * **@CODE@**
pelnub:pel#nub num ;
lakknub:lakk#nub num ;
pelnubčyet:pel#nub#čyet num ;
pelnubčyeđe:pel#nub#čyeđe num ;
maŋgâ:ma^RVŋgâ KULMA ;
maŋgâčyet:ma^RVŋgâ#čyet CYETI ;
muáddičyet:muáddi#čyet CYETI ;
maŋgâlov:ma^RVŋgâ# LOV ;
muáddilov:muáddi# LOV ;
muáddi:muáddi KYEHTI ;
miljovn+Num:miljovn X_LITTER ;
muáddituhháát+Num:muáddi#tuhháát X_POTTAAK ;



LEXICON ARABICCOMPOUNDS   !!≈ * **@CODE@**   arabic as first part, 
 +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:»»»- SASCont ;
 +Cmp/Hyph+Der+Der/ahasas:-ahas ANOLASJ  ;
 +Cmp/Hyph:»»»- NAMAG ;
! +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:»»»- SAS ;
 +Der+Der/ivvaas+Sem/Dummytag:ivvá A_VUALAAS ;

! :-  NAMAT ;            ! 10-jienat, etc. NAMAT derivs are
!                    ! treated as compounds and excluded from the nonrec
!                    ! variants, otherwise the PLX lexicon size explodes
!+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-»»# SASCont ; !6-jahkásaš
+Use/NG: RHyph ; ! 3-
  

LEXICON NUMERALCOMPOUNDS !!≈ * **@CODE@**: numeral as first part: duhatjienat,
!                         !!  logigielat, etc.
!         NAMAT ; ! duhatjienat, logigielat, etc. NAMAT derivs are
!                 ! treated as compounds and excluded from the nonrec
!                 ! variants, otherwise the PLX lexicon size explodes
! SAS ; !viđajahkásaš

! +Der+Der/ihasas:ihás ANOLASJ  ;
 NAMAG ;
  SAS  ;

+Use/NG: RHyph ; ! golmma-


LEXICON ORDINAL	  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
vuossâmuš+A+Der1+Der/Superl+A:vuossâ MUSj-SUF ; !sme has not Ord for this
vuosmuš+A+Ord:vuos MUSj-SUF "ensimmäinen" ;	!¢vuosmuin, vuosmust, vuosmui, vuosmuš   !MUSj-SUF gives vuosmuust
vuosmuš+A+Ord+Err/Orth:vuoss MUSj-SUF "ensimmäinen" ;	!
nubbe+A+Ord:nu^RVbbe  nubbecase ;		   
kuálmád+A+Ord:kuálmád ORDINALInfl ;	   
niäljád+A+Ord:niäljád ORDINALInfl ;	   
viiđâd+A+Ord:viiđâd ORDINALInfl ;		   
kuuđâd+A+Ord:kuuđâd ORDINALInfl ;		   
čiččâd+A+Ord:čičč5âd CICCADInfl ;	   
káávcád+A+Ord:káávcád ORDINALInfl ;	   
oovcád+A+Ord:oovcád ORDINALInfl ;	
kallaad+A+Ord:kallaad X_EEMEED ;
   
